Utah statutes.
17B-1-306.5.   Dividing a local district into divisions.

(1)  Subject to Subsection (2), the board of trustees of a local district may, upon a vote of two-thirds of the members of the board, divide the local district into divisions so that some or all of the members of the board of trustees may be elected by division rather than at large.

(2)  Before dividing a local district into divisions under Subsection (1) or before changing the boundaries of divisions already established, the board of trustees shall:

(a)  prepare a proposal that describes the boundaries of the proposed divisions; and

(b)  hold a public hearing at which any interested person may appear and speak for or against the proposal.

(3) (a)  The board of trustees shall review the division boundaries at least every 10 years.

(b)  Except for changes in the divisions necessitated by annexations to or withdrawals from the local district, the boundaries of divisions established under Subsection (1) may not be changed more often than every five years.

(c)  Changes to the boundaries of divisions already established under Subsection (1) are not subject to the two-thirds vote requirement of Subsection (1).

